Washington statutes.
RCW 10.40.110

Demurrer to indictment or information.

The defendant may demur to the indictment or information when it appears upon its face either—

(1) That it does not substantially conform to the requirements of this code;

(2) [That] more than one crime is charged;

(3) That the facts charged do not constitute a crime;

(4) That the indictment or information contains any matter which, if true, would constitute a defense or other legal bar to the action.

[ 1891 c 28 s 55; Code 1881 s 1051; RRS s 2105.]